South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-1-460 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-1-460.  (A) The school district board of trustees mayshall adopt a policy that authorizes aany student under its jurisdiction to be excused from school to attend a class in religious instruction conducted by a private entity if: (1) the student's parent or guardian gives written consent; (2) the sponsoring entity maintains attendance records and makes them available to the public school the student attends; (3) transportation to and from the place of instruction, including transportation for students with disabilities, is the complete responsibility of the sponsoring entity, parent, or guardian; (4) the sponsoring entity makes provisions for and assumes liability for the student who is excused;  and (5) no public funds are expended, other than for de minimis administrative costs, and no public school personnel are involved in providing the religious instruction. (B) It is the responsibility of a participating student to make up any missed schoolwork. However, no student may be released from a core academic subject classinstruction in English, math, and science to attend a religious instruction class. While in attendance in a religious instruction class pursuant to this section, a student is not considered to be absent from school. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----